Wyoming, session 2025, SF0062.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-3-137 is created to read:
21-3-137. Restrooms and changing rooms in public
schools; designated sleeping quarters for school‑sponsored
activities; requirements; definitions; penalties;
rulemaking.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Coach" means a person, including but not
limited to coaches, assistant coaches or athletic trainers,
employed by or contracted with a public school who is
involved in the teaching, coaching or training of students
participating in a school-sponsored activity;
(ii) "Female" means a person who has, had, will
have or would have had, but for a congenital anomaly or
intentional or unintentional disruption, the reproductive
system that at some point produces, transports and utilizes
eggs for fertilization;
(iii) "Male" means a person who has, had, will
have or would have had, but for a congenital anomaly or
intentional or unintentional disruption, the reproductive
system that at some point produces, transports and utilizes
sperm for fertilization;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0062
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iv) "Restroom" or "changing room" means a room
in a public school building designed or designated to be
used by one (1) or more persons, where persons may be in
various stages of undress in the presence of other persons.
The term includes but is not limited to a school restroom,
locker room, changing room or shower room;
(v) "School-sponsored activity" means an event
that is supported and affiliated with the school;
(vi) "Sex" means a person's biological sex,
either male or female;
(vii) "Sleeping quarters" means an area with at
least one (1) bed or cot in which at least one (1) person
is housed overnight on or off public school property when
attending a school-sponsored activity.
(b) To ensure privacy and safety, each public school
district that serves students in pre-kindergarten through
twelfth grade in this state shall require every multiple
occupancy restroom, changing room or sleeping quarters to
be designated as follows:
(i) For the exclusive use of the male sex; or
(ii) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
(c) Each public school district shall provide a
reasonable accommodation to any person who does not wish to
use a multiple occupancy restroom, changing room or
sleeping quarters in accordance with the designation
required under subsection (b) of this section. For purposes
of this subsection, a reasonable accommodation shall
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0062
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
include a single-occupancy restroom, changing room or
sleeping quarters. A reasonable accommodation granted under
this subsection shall not include access to a restroom,
changing area or sleeping quarters that is designated for
use by members of the opposite sex while persons of the
opposite sex are present or could be present.
(d) This section shall not apply to persons entering
a multiple occupancy restroom, changing room or sleeping
quarters designated for use by the opposite sex when
entering for at least one (1) of the following reasons:
(i) For custodial, maintenance, repair or
inspection purposes;
(ii) To render emergency medical assistance;
(iii) If a suitable meeting room or area is not
available, a coach may enter a locker room before, during
or after a school-sponsored activity, provided:
(A) All students present are fully clothed;
(B) The coach shall be accompanied by not
less than one (1) additional adult at all times;
(C) If the coach is the opposite sex of the
students present, the coach shall be accompanied by at
least one (1) adult of the same sex as the students
present; and
(D) The adults present shall not be current
high school students.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0062
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iv) For an adult to render assistance to any
student or person requiring assistance because of
disability or age;
(v) If a suitable meeting room or area is not
available and the coach is the coach of a school-sponsored
activity with members of both the male and female sexes on
the team or in the activity, the coach may enter a locker
room before, during or after the school-sponsored activity
if all students are fully clothed. The coach shall be
accompanied by not less than one (1) additional adult at
all times but an additional adult shall not be required if
members of the activity of both sexes are present in the
locker room. The adults present shall not be current high
school students;
(vi) To render caregiving assistance;
(vii) To receive assistance if the person is
accompanied by a family member, legal guardian or the
person's designee who is a member of the designated sex for
the single-sex restroom, changing area or sleeping
quarters;
(viii) When necessary to prevent a serious
threat to public health or student safety during an ongoing
natural disaster or emergency;
(ix) When a school official or employee enters a
restroom, changing area or sleeping quarters while in the
performance of the official's or employee's official duties
and who takes reasonable steps to ensure that no person in
the room is in a state of undress;
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0062
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(x) When a restroom, changing area or sleeping
quarters has been temporarily designated for use by the
opposite sex.
(e) Each school district board of trustees shall
adopt policies to provide for disciplinary action for
persons who refuse to comply with this section.
(f) No school district board of trustees shall adopt
a policy contrary to the provisions of this section.
(g) A parent or legal guardian of a student enrolled
in and physically attending a public school district shall
have a cause of action, including for declaratory and
injunctive relief, against the public school for
noncompliance with the provisions of subsection (b), (c) or
(d) of this section.
Section 2. W.S. 21-3-110(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xliv) is amended to read:
21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.
(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:
(xliv) Ensure that each school district in the
state requires every multiple occupancy restroom, changing
room or sleeping quarters be designated for the exclusive
use of the male sex or the exclusive use of the female sex.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0062
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
6